Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Military  Department may enter into cooperative agreements
with the federal National Guard Bureau.
(2) The  department may select any available payment method option for a cooperative
agreement, including the advance payment method.
(3) If the department selects the advance  payment method for a cooperative agreement,
the department may not incur a funding obligation that is  payable or reimbursable from
federal moneys  under the cooperative agreement unless moneys sufficient to meet the obli-
gation are available in the State Treasury and:
(a) Are available for expenditure by the department; and
(b) Are not committed or encumbered for any other purpose.
(4) The department may adopt rules as necessary to  maintain the eligibility of the state
to receive advance payments under cooperative agreements with the federal  National Guard
Bureau.
SECTION 2.
The State Treasurer, at the  request of the Oregon Military Department,
may create accounts in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund,
pursuant to a cooperative agreement described in section 1 of this 2019 Act or  federal stat-
utes or regulations governing the cooperative agreement. Interest earned by such an account
must be credited to the account. Moneys in  accounts created under this section are contin-
uously appropriated to the Oregon Military Department.
Enrolled Senate Bill 252 (SB 252-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 28, 2019
Repassed by Senate June 5, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 252 (SB 252-B) Page 2